Utah statutes.
63C-11-309.   Medical examinations and drug tests.

(1)  The commission shall adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, for medical examinations and drug testing of contestants, including provisions under which contestants shall:

(a)  produce evidence based upon competent laboratory examination that they are HIV negative as a condition of participating as a contestant in any contest;

(b)  be subject to random drug testing before or after participation in a contest, and sanctions, including barring participation in a contest or withholding a percentage of any purse, that shall be placed against a contestant testing positive for alcohol or any other drug that in the opinion of the commission is inconsistent with the safe and competent participation of that contestant in a contest;

(c)  be subject to a medical examination by the ringside physician not more than 30 hours before the contest to identify any physical ailment or communicable disease that, in the opinion of the commission or designated commission member, are inconsistent with the safe and competent participation of that contestant in the contest; and

(d)  be subject to medical testing for communicable diseases as considered necessary by the commission to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the licensees and the public.

(2) (a)  Medical information concerning a contestant shall be provided by the contestant or medical professional or laboratory.

(b)  A promoter or manager may not provide to or receive from the commission medical information concerning a contestant.

